District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-154

Annual Board of Education report and budget revision.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 30, 1994, 108 Stat. 2594, Pub. L. 103-334, § 143
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 32, 44 DCR 1271
July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-149, § 4, 47 DCR 4639
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 1005, 54 DCR 4102
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 203(e), 56 DCR 1117
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 4035, 57 DCR 6242

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-104.2.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 4035 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).